Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1402DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1402DP (2) 91
ss/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 68A.201, subsection 2, paragraphs a and
b, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows:
a. The name, purpose, mailing address, electronic mail
address, and telephone number of the committee. The committee
name shall not duplicate the name of another committee
organized under this section. For candidate’s committees
filing initial statements of organization on or after July
1, 1995, the candidate’s name shall be contained within the
committee name.
b. The name, mailing address, electronic mail address, and
position of the committee officers.
Sec. 2. Section 68A.201A, subsection 6, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
6. The verified statement shall be filed by 4:30 in an
electronic format no later than 11:59 p.m. of the day the
filing is due.
Sec. 3. Section 68A.303, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
5. A candidate, candidate’s committee, or any other person
shall not directly or indirectly receive or transfer campaign
funds with the intent of circumventing the requirements of this
section. A candidate for statewide or legislative office shall
not establish, direct, or maintain a political committee.
Sec. 4. Section 68A.401, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
a. A state statutory political committee, a county statutory
political committee, a political committee, and a candidate’s
committee shall file all statements and reports in an
electronic format by 4:30 no later than 11:59 p.m. of the day
the filing is due and according to rules adopted by the board.
Sec. 5. Section 68A.405, subsection 1, paragraph a,
subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(3) “Published material” means any newspaper, magazine,
shopper, outdoor advertising facility, poster, direct mailing,
brochure, internet site, campaign sign, or any other form of
LSB 1402DP (2) 91
-1- ss/ns 1/3

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
printed or electronic general public political advertising.
“Published material” includes radio, television, video, or
motion picture internet advertising.
Sec. 6. Section 68B.32, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
3. The board shall annually elect one member to serve as
the chairperson of the board and one member to serve as vice
chairperson. The vice chairperson shall act as the chairperson
in the absence or disability of the chairperson or in the
event of a vacancy in that office. The chairperson and vice
chairperson shall not be members of the same political party.